apertium-mrj-fin.mrj.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for UNDEFINED language
! Copyright © 2012 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

!! Morphology
!! ----------
!! INTRODUCTION TO MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF UNDEFINED LANGUAGE.


Multichar_Symbols
!! Analysis symbols
!! ----------------
!! The morphological analyses of wordforms of UNDEFINED language are presented
!! in this system in terms of following symbols.
!! (It is highly suggested to follow existing standards when adding new tags).

!! The parts-of-speech are:
 %<n%> %<a%> %<adv%> %<v%>
 %<pron%> %<cs%> %<cc%> %<adp%> %<po%> %<pr%> %<interj%> %<pcle%> %<num%> %<descr%>

!! The parts of speech are further split up into:
!!! Nouns
  %<prop%>
!!! Pronouns
 %<dem%>    !!≈ ;@CODE@: demonstrative
 %<indef%>  !!≈ ;@CODE@: indefinite
 %<dep%>    !!≈ ;@CODE@: dependent word requiring the presence of noun, e.g. ӹшке
 %<interr%> !!≈ ;@CODE@: interrogative
 %<pers%>   !!≈ ;@CODE@: personal
 %<recipr%> !!≈ ;@CODE@: reciprocal
 %<refl%>   !!≈ ;@CODE@: reflexive
 %<rel%>    !!≈ ;@CODE@: relative

!!! Verbs
  %<aux%>

!! The Usage extents are marked using following tags:
 %<use_sub%>   
 %<use_-spell%> 

!! Forms from older orthographic norms are marked with the following tags:
 %<orth_1933%>
 ! Йарускан Польикарп,
 ! Граматьика, пӹтӓрыш кӹдэж
 ! ШАМАК ТЫМЭНЬМӒШ (МОРФОЛОГИ)
 ! КӸДӒЛӒШ ШКОЛВЛӒШТӸ ТЫМЭНЬШӒШЛЫК КНЬИГА, ВӸЗӸМШӸ ИН ТЫМЭНЬМЫ
 ! Маробон йарыктэн. УЧПЭДГИЗ, МОСКВА 1933

!! The nominals are inflected in the following Case and Number
 %<sg%> %<du%> %<pl%>
 %<ess%> %<nom%> %<gen%> %<acc%> %<ill%> %<loc%> %<com%> %<com_sh%>

!! The possession is marked as such:
 %<pxsg1%> %<pxsg2%> %<pxsg3%> %<pxdu1%> %<pxdu2%> %<pxdu3%> %<pxpl1%> %<pxpl2%> %<pxpl3%>
!! The comparative forms are:
 %<comp%> %<superl%>
!! Numerals are classified under:
 %<attr%> %<card%>
 %<ord%> 
!! Verb moods are:
 %<ind%> %<prs%> %<prt1%> %<prt2%> %<pot%> %<cond%> %<imprt%>
!! Verb personal forms are:
 %<sg1%> %<sg2%> %<sg3%> %<du1%> %<du2%> %<du3%> %<pl1%> %<pl2%> %<pl3%>
!! Other verb forms are
 %<inf%>
 %<ger%>
 %<conneg%> %<connegii%> %<neg%>
 %<imprtii%> !! ыма
 %<prcact%> !! active participle ЫшЫ
 %<prcpss%> !! passive participle ЫмЫ
 %<prcneg%> !! negative passive participle ЫдЫмЫ
 %<sup%> %<vgen%> %<vabess%>

! Abbreviated words are classified with:
 %<abbr%> %<acr%> 
!! Special symbols are classified with:
%<clb%> %<punct%> %<left%> %<right%>
!! The verbs are syntactically split according to transitivity:
 %<tv%> %<iv%>
!! Special multiword units are analysed with:
 %<multi%>
!! Non-dictionary words can be recognised with:
 %<guess%>

!! Question and Focus particles:
 %<qst%> %<foc%>


!! Semantics are classified with
 %<mal%> %<fem%> %<sur%> 
 %<plc%> 
 %<org%>
 %<obj%>
 %<ani%>
 %<hum%>
 %<plant%>
 %<group%>
 %<time%> 
 %<txt%>
 %<route%>
 %<measr%> 
 %<wthr%>
 %<build%> 
 %<edu%>
 %<veh%>
 %<clth%>


!! Derivations are classified under the morphophonetic form of the suffix, the
!! source and target part-of-speech.
 %<v→n%> %<v→v%> %<v→a%>
 %<der_ышы%>
 %<der_ымы%>
 %<der_ыдымы%>
 %<der_n%> !! Noun derivation
 %<foc_ат%>

!! Morphophonology
!! ---------------
!! To represent phonologic variations in word forms we use the following
!! symbols in the lexicon files:
 {aä} {oö} {uü}
 Ы1 Ы2 А1 А2 Е2 Е3
 Ь2 ! V_АМ %<prt1%>%<sg1%>
!! And following triggers to control variation
 {front} {back}
%^ConsTransf !! k loss in am-verbs, also z to ts
%^KIN !! with kin terms for ӓвӓмӹн not мӱэмӹн

!! We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
!! flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics:
@P.NeedNoun.ON@  @D.NeedNoun.ON@  @C.NeedNoun@

LEXICON Root
!! The word forms in Hill Mari start from the lexeme roots of basic
!! word classes, or optionally from prefixes:
!! The assumption is that xml files with names pos.xml will provide the source material for
!! the initial pos.lexc _LEXICON Pos_ entries
   adjectives  ; 
   adverbs  ;
   conjunctions    ;
   descriptives    ;
   interjections    ;
   nouns   ;
   particles    ;
   postpositions    ;
!    Prefixes    ; ! This might be used with indefinite pronouns
   pronouns    ;
   propernouns    ;
   quantifiers   ;
   verbs   ;

!Abbreviation ;
!Acronym ;
Punctuation ;
!wordToNumeral ;

Exceptions ;

 urj-Cyrl-ProperNouns ; ! This is the template

!! Small parts of speech

LEXICON GER-en
%<v%>%<ger%>: K ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
! ============================= !
! File containing abbreviations !
! ============================= !

! Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

! Splitting in 3 groups, because of the preprocessor
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Abbreviation
noperiod ;
ITRAB ;
TRNUMAB ;
TRAB ;

! Now splitting according to POS, and according to dot or not
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

! First collecting POS info, *-noun, *-adv, etc.
! Also splitting when in doubt: -noun-adj => -noun and -adj
! Then pointing to two contlexes, a dot-one and a non-dot-one.

LEXICON ab ! No POS, don't know what pos
ab-nodot ;
ab-dot ;

LEXICON ab-noun
ab-nodot-noun ;
ab-dot-noun ;

!LEXICON ab-adj
!ab-nodot-adj ;
!ab-dot-adj ;

!LEXICON ab-adv
!ab-nodot-adv ;
!ab-dot-adv ;

!LEXICON ab-num
!ab-nodot-num ;
!ab-dot-num;

! Here come POS and Case tags, and no period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun ! The bulk
%<n%>%<abbr%>: # ;  ! no period, that is.

LEXICON ab-nodot ! default
%<abbr%>: # ;  ! no period, that is.

! Here come POS and Case tags, with the period added.

LEXICON ab-dot ! Default
%<abbr%>:%. # ;

LEXICON ab-dot-noun ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
%<n%>%<abbr%>:%. # ;

! The idea is that the nominal ones may have case, like e.g. P.E.N.


! The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------

! The ones without final period are listed first. They do not
! need the transitivity division.

LEXICON noperiod
км² ab-nodot-noun ;
км ab-nodot-noun ;
см ab-nodot-noun ;
гг ab-nodot-noun ;
м3/с ab-nodot-noun ;
кв  ab-nodot-noun ;

! =============================================== !
!            Intransitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

! These give clause boundaries before capital letters
! and numbers, but not elsewhere.
! Vi bor i Sth. CLB 10 av oss er innflyttere.
! Vi bor i Sth. CLB Saara er også innflytter.
! Vi vet at Sth. er en fin by.


LEXICON ITRAB


в ab ;
г ab ;
гг ab ;


! =============================================== !
!    Transitive number-related abbreviations      !
! =============================================== !

! These ones are transitive when followed by numbers or
! singleton letters, and intransitive elsewhere.
! Gården har Gnr. 10.
! Gården har Gnr. 5. a.
! Alle gårder har ikke Gnr. CLB Det er et problem.
! Alle gårder har ikke Gnr. og det er et problem.

LEXICON TRNUMAB

Apd		ab-dot ;                                      !
Вып ab-dot ;


! =============================================== !
!              Transitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON Acronym
acros ;
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr2 ;

LEXICON acr2
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr3 ;

LEXICON acr3
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr4 ;
acrotag ;

LEXICON TRAB
досл ab-dot ;
А ab-noun ;
Б ab-noun ;
В ab-noun ;
Г ab-noun ;
Д ab-noun ;
Е ab-noun ;
Ж ab-noun ;
З ab-noun ;
И ab-noun ;
Й ab-noun ;
К ab-noun ;
Л ab-noun ;
М ab-noun ;
Н ab-noun ;
О ab-noun ;
П ab-noun ;
Р ab-noun ;
С ab-noun ;
Т ab-noun ;
У ab-noun ;
Ф ab-noun ;
Х ab-noun ;
Ц ab-noun ;
Ч ab-noun ;
Ш ab-noun ;
Щ ab-noun ;
Ъ ab-noun ;
Ы ab-noun ;
Ь ab-noun ;
Э ab-noun ;
Ю ab-noun ;
Я ab-noun ;
Ё ab-noun ;
І ab-noun ;
Ӧ ab-noun ;
а ab-noun ;
б ab-noun ;
в ab-noun ;
г ab-noun ;
д ab-noun ;
е ab-noun ;
ж ab-noun ;
з ab-noun ;
и ab-noun ;
й ab-noun ;
к ab-noun ;
л ab-noun ;
м ab-noun ;
н ab-noun ;
о ab-noun ;
п ab-noun ;
р ab-noun ;
с ab-noun ;
т ab-noun ;
у ab-noun ;
ф ab-noun ;
х ab-noun ;
ц ab-noun ;
ч ab-noun ;
ш ab-noun ;
щ ab-noun ;
ъ ab-noun ;
ы ab-noun ;
ь ab-noun ;
э ab-noun ;
ю ab-noun ;
я ab-noun ;
ё ab-noun ;
і ab-noun ;
ӧ ab-noun ;
LEXICON nouns
алмаштен:алмаштен GER-en   ; !"vaihtaen"
шӱтен:шӱтен GER-en   ; !""
